Alabama, session 2026rs, SB197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) CERTIFYING FIRE OFFICIAL. The State Fire Marshal or
a local fire department authorized to conduct fire safety
inspections under subdivision (c)(1).
(2) COMMISSARY. A food service establishment permitted
by the Alabama Department of Public Health to which a mobile
food unit returns after operating for the day for servicing
and resupplying.
(3) IFC MOBILE FOOD PREPARATION VEHICLES PROVISIONS.
The International Fire Code provisions for mobile food
preparation vehicles as adopted by the Alabama Department of
Insurance for State Fire Marshal regulations.
(4) MOBILE FOOD UNIT. A mobile food service
Page 1

(4) MOBILE FOOD UNIT. A mobile food service
SB197 Enrolled
establishment from which a vendor prepares, cooks, sells, or
serves food. The term includes any mobile food establishment
regulated by the Alabama Department of Public Health,
including any structure housed on a motor vehicle chassis or
vessel or on a trailer that a motor vehicle pulls to transport
the cooking equipment or food service establishment, or a cart
used for food services which is not motorized.
(b)(1) On and after January 1, 2027, a mobile food unit
that holds a valid health inspection certificate and a valid
fire inspection certificate in accordance with subsection (c)
shall be exempt from any further health or fire safety
inspections that are or would otherwise be required by the
governing body of a county or municipality or political
subdivision thereof as a condition to operating the mobile
food unit in that local jurisdiction; provided, however, a
county health department or certifying fire official may: (i)
inspect a mobile food unit at any time while in operation; and
(ii) order the mobile food unit to immediately cease
operations if a significant health violation or life safety
violation is discovered.
(2) The health inspection and certification described
in subdivision (1) shall be conducted by the county health
department in the jurisdiction where the mobile food unit's
commissary is located. The fire inspection and certification
shall be conducted by any fire official of a local fire
department in the state authorized pursuant to subdivision
(c)(1).
(c)(1) The State Fire Marshal shall maintain a list of
Page 2

(c)(1) The State Fire Marshal shall maintain a list of
SB197 Enrolled
local fire departments in the state that are authorized by the
State Fire Marshal to conduct fire inspections pursuant to
this section.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall establish a uniform
statewide fire safety inspection process for mobile food units
to ensure compliance with all state adopted codes and
standards. The fire safety inspection shall be in compliance
with IFC Mobile Food Preparation Vehicles provisions and shall
ensure, at a minimum, that:
a. All hoods and hood suppression systems comply with
the requirements of NFPA 96;
b. Hood suppression systems are serviced and tagged at
least every six months;
c. Hood cleaning is performed and tagged at least every
six months;
d. All LP-gas systems comply with NFPA 58 and IFC
Mobile Food Preparation Vehicles provisions;
e. An annual LP-gas pressure test is performed by a gas
fitter certified by the Alabama Liquefied Petroleum Gas Board;
f. Plumbing for LP-gas is installed in compliance with
NFPA 58; and
g. All electrical appliances comply with NFPA 70.
(3) A mobile food vendor unit shall maintain and make
available all records for equipment and maintenance.
(4) Any modification or alteration of an appliance,
operating procedure, or safety equipment of a mobile food unit
may void a fire inspection certificate.
(5) A fire inspection certificate shall be valid for a
Page 3

(5) A fire inspection certificate shall be valid for a
SB197 Enrolled
six-month period.
(6) Significant violations shall be addressed by the
certifying fire official and referred to the State Fire
Marshal.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the
governing body of a county or municipality or political
subdivision thereof from requiring a mobile food unit, as a
condition of operating in that jurisdiction, to comply with
any ordinance or regulation, including requiring a business
license.
(e) To the extent that a mobile food unit is required
by law, rule, regulation, or ordinance to undergo a health or
fire safety inspection, whether state or local, as a condition
to operate in a specific jurisdiction, this section shall
supersede any such provision but shall otherwise be construed
100 in pari materia with other state and local laws.
101 (f) On and after January 1, 2027, the owner of a mobile
102 food unit who operates a mobile food unit or allows the mobile
103 food unit to operate without a valid health inspection
104 certificate and a valid fire inspection certificate issued
105 pursuant to this section shall be guilty of a Class C
106 misdemeanor. Upon a second or subsequent violation, the owner
107 shall be prohibited from operating the mobile food unit for a
108 period of 30 days.
109 (g) Nothing in this section shall prevent a health
110 officer of fire safety officer from inspecting a mobile food
111 unit and taking other appropriate measures if he or she
112 reasonably believes there is an immediate risk to public
Page 4

reasonably believes there is an immediate risk to public
SB197 Enrolled
113 health or safety.
114 Section 2. This act shall become effective on July 1,
115 2026.
Page 5

2026.
SB197 Enrolled
116
117
118
119
120
121
122 ________________________________________________
123 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
124
125
126
127 ________________________________________________
128 Speaker of the House of Representatives
129
130
131 SB197
132 Senate 19-Feb-26
133 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
134 the Senate, as amended.
135
136 Patrick Harris,
137 Secretary.
138
139
140
141
142 House of Representatives
143 Passed: 02-Apr-26
144
145
146
147
148 By: Senator Roberts
Page 6